Florida, session 2026, SB1596.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âParagraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (2) of 12 section 458.320, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 13 458.320âFinancial responsibility.â 14 (2)âPhysicians who perform surgery in an ambulatory 15 surgical center licensed under chapter 395 and, as a continuing 16 condition of hospital staff privileges, physicians who have 17 staff privileges must also establish financial responsibility by 18 one of the following methods: 19 (b)âObtaining and maintaining professional liability 20 coverage in an amount not less than $1 million $250,000 per 21 claim, with a minimum annual aggregate of not less than $3 22 million $750,000 from an authorized insurer as defined under s. 23 624.09, from a surplus lines insurer as defined under s. 24 626.914(2), from a risk retention group as defined under s. 25 627.942, from the Joint Underwriting Association established 26 under s. 627.351(4), through a plan of self-insurance as 27 provided in s. 627.357, or through a plan of self-insurance 28 which meets the conditions specified for satisfying financial 29 responsibility in s. 766.110. The required coverage amount set 30 forth in this paragraph may not be used for litigation costs or 31 attorney attorneyâs fees for the defense of any medical 32 malpractice claim. 33 (c)âObtaining and maintaining an unexpired irrevocable 34 letter of credit, established pursuant to chapter 675, in an 35 amount not less than $1 million $250,000 per claim, with a 36 minimum aggregate availability of credit of not less than $3 37 million $750,000. The letter of credit must be payable to the 38 physician as beneficiary upon presentment of a final judgment 39 indicating liability and awarding damages to be paid by the 40 physician or upon presentment of a settlement agreement signed 41 by all parties to such agreement when such final judgment or 42 settlement is a result of a claim arising out of the rendering 43 of, or the failure to render, medical care and services. The 44 letter of credit may not be used for litigation costs or 45 attorney attorneyâs fees for the defense of any medical 46 malpractice claim. The letter of credit must be nonassignable 47 and nontransferable. The letter of credit must be issued by any 48 bank or savings association organized and existing under the 49 laws of this state or any bank or savings association organized 50 under the laws of the United States which has its principal 51 place of business in this state or has a branch office that is 52 authorized under the laws of this state or of the United States 53 to receive deposits in this state. 54 55 This subsection shall be inclusive of the coverage in subsection 56 (1). 57 Section 2.âParagraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (2) of 58 section 459.0085, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 59 459.0085âFinancial responsibility.â 60 (2)âOsteopathic physicians who perform surgery in an 61 ambulatory surgical center licensed under chapter 395 and, as a 62 continuing condition of hospital staff privileges, osteopathic 63 physicians who have staff privileges must also establish 64 financial responsibility by one of the following methods: 65 (b)âObtaining and maintaining professional liability 66 coverage in an amount not less than $1 million $250,000 per 67 claim, with a minimum annual aggregate of not less than $3 68 million $750,000 from an authorized insurer as defined under s. 69 624.09, from a surplus lines insurer as defined under s. 70 626.914(2), from a risk retention group as defined under s. 71 627.942, from the Joint Underwriting Association established 72 under s. 627.351(4), through a plan of self-insurance as 73 provided in s. 627.357, or through a plan of self-insurance that 74 meets the conditions specified for satisfying financial 75 responsibility in s. 766.110. The required coverage amount set 76 forth in this paragraph may not be used for litigation costs or 77 attorney attorneyâs fees for the defense of any medical 78 malpractice claim. 79 (c)âObtaining and maintaining an unexpired, irrevocable 80 letter of credit, established pursuant to chapter 675, in an 81 amount not less than $1 million $250,000 per claim, with a 82 minimum aggregate availability of credit of not less than $3 83 million $750,000. The letter of credit must be payable to the 84 osteopathic physician as beneficiary upon presentment of a final 85 judgment indicating liability and awarding damages to be paid by 86 the osteopathic physician or upon presentment of a settlement 87 agreement signed by all parties to such agreement when such 88 final judgment or settlement is a result of a claim arising out 89 of the rendering of, or the failure to render, medical care and 90 services. The letter of credit may not be used for litigation 91 costs or attorney attorneyâs fees for the defense of any medical 92 malpractice claim. The letter of credit must be nonassignable 93 and nontransferable. The letter of credit must be issued by any 94 bank or savings association organized and existing under the 95 laws of this state or any bank or savings association organized 96 under the laws of the United States which has its principal 97 place of business in this state or has a branch office that is 98 authorized under the laws of this state or of the United States 99 to receive deposits in this state. 100 101 This subsection shall be inclusive of the coverage in subsection 102 (1). 103 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.